Massachusetts, session 194th, S1963.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended in paragraph (a) of Subsection B by adding the following
subparagraph (20): The AmeriCorps Segal Education Award, as stipulated in subtitle D of title I
of the National and Community Service Act of 1990. The AmeriCorps Segal Education Award is
available to individuals who complete a term of service in the AmeriCorps program. The
education award can be used to pay education costs at eligible institutions of higher learning
including technical schools, for educational training, or to repay qualified student loans, as
determined eligible by the federal government.
SECTION 2. This law shall become effective 180 days after its passage.
of 1